Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1871.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 401 of Title 75A, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this section:


1. “Account” means a digital profile on a social media platform


that is created by a user;


2. “Connected account” means an account on a social media


platform that is directly connected to:


a. a minor user’s account, or

Req. No. 2745 Page 1


b. an account that is directly connected to an account


directly connected to a minor user’s account;


3. “Content” means any information, visual depictions, tools,


features, links, software, or other materials that appear on or are


available or enabled through a social media platform;


4. “Directly connected” means an account on the social media


platform that is connected to another account by:


a. sending a request to connect to another account holder


and having the request to connect accepted by the


other account holder, or


b. receiving a request to connect from another account


holder and accepting the request to connect;


5. “Minor” means an individual under eighteen (18) years of


age;


6. “Personal information” means information that is linked or


can be reasonably linked to an individual, including, but not


limited to:


a. first and last name,


b. date of birth,


c. home or physical address, including street name and


city,


d. screen name or username that reveals an individual’s


electronic mail address, first name, or last name,


e. telephone number,

Req. No. 2745 Page 2


f. Social Security number,


g. photograph, video, or audio file containing a person’s


image or voice,


h. geolocation information sufficient to identify street


name and city, and


i. any other identifier that a person may use to contact


a specific individual;


7. “Push notification” means an automatic electronic message


displayed on an account holder’s device, when the user interface for


the social media service is not actively open or visible on the


device, that prompts the account holder to check or engage with the


social media platform;


8. “Reasonable age verification measure” means a method of age


verification that is authenticated through the upload of a valid


state-issued form of identification to relate to a user of a social


media platform;


9. “Reasonable age verification process” means an age


verification process employed by a social media company that:


a. uses one or more reasonable age verification measures


in order to verify the age of a user of the social


media platform owned, operated, or otherwise made


available by the social media company,


b. provides that requiring a user to confirm that the


user is not a minor, or to insert the user’s birth

Req. No. 2745 Page 3


date, is not sufficient to constitute a reasonable age


verification measure,


c. ensures that each user is subjected to each reasonable


age verification measure used by the social media


company as part of the age verification process, and


d. does not base verification of a user’s age on factors


such as whether the user shares an Internet protocol


(IP) address, hardware identifier, or other technical


indicator with another user determined to not be a


minor;


10. “Social media company” means an entity that owns or


operates a social media platform;


11. “Social media platform” means a website or Internet medium


that:


a. permits a person to become a registered user,


establish an account, or create a profile for the


purpose of allowing users to create, share, and view


user-generated content through such an account or


profile,


b. enables one or more users to generate content that can


be viewed by other users of the medium, and


c. primarily serves as a medium for users to interact


with content generated by other users of the medium;


and

Req. No. 2745 Page 4


12. “User” means an individual who accesses or uses a social


media platform.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 402 of Title 75A, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A social media company shall require each individual


accessing its social media platforms to create a user account in


order to interact with its services.


B. With respect to each user account of a social media platform


that exists as of the effective date of this act, a social media


company shall:


1. On such date, freeze all accounts;


2. In order to restore the functionality of an account, require


that the user provide age data that is verifiable using a reasonable


verification process subject to subsection D of this section; and


3. Using age data, classify each user as a minor or an adult.


C. At the time an individual creates a new user account to


access its services, a social media platform shall:


1. Request age data from the individual;


2. Verify the individual’s age using a reasonable age


verification process, subject to subsection D of this section; and


3. Using age data, classify each user as a minor or an adult.


D. A social media platform may contract with a third party to


employ reasonable age verification measures as part of the social

Req. No. 2745 Page 5


media platform’s reasonable age verification process, but the use of


a third party shall not relieve the social media platform of its


obligations under this act or from liability under this act.


E. 1. A social media platform shall segregate any personal


information gathered specifically for reasonable age verification


purposes and shall not use the personal information for any other


purpose except those provided in subparagraphs a through f of


paragraph 2 of subsection G of this section.


2. If a user is determined to be a minor, a social media


platform shall:


a. set default privacy settings to prioritize maximum


privacy of such minor user’s account, including


settings that:


(1) restrict the visibility of the minor user’s


account to only connected accounts,


(2) limit the minor user’s ability to share content


to only connected accounts,


(3) restrict any data collection and sale of data


from a minor user’s account that is not otherwise


required for core functioning of the social media


platform,


(4) disable search engine indexing of the minor


user’s profiles,



Req. No. 2745 Page 6


(5) restrict a minor user’s direct messaging


capabilities to only allow for direct messaging


to connected accounts, and


(6) allow a minor user to download a file with all


information associated with his or her account,


b. implement and maintain reasonable security measures,


including data encryption, to protect the


confidentiality, security, and integrity of personal


information collected from a minor user who is a


resident of this state,


c. provide an easily accessible and understandable notice


that:


(1) describes any information the social media


platform collects from a minor user, and


(2) explains how the information may be used or


disclosed, and


d. disable the following features that prolong engagement


on a social media platform by a minor user:


(1) autoplay functions that continuously play content


without user interaction,


(2) scroll or pagination that loads additional


content as long as the user continues scrolling,


and



Req. No. 2745 Page 7


(3) push notifications prompting repeated user


engagement.


3. Upon request of a parent or legal guardian of a minor user,


a social media platform shall:


a. delete the personal information of the minor user,


unless the information is required to be retained


pursuant to state or federal law, and


b. remove any information or material the minor user made


publicly available through the social media platform.


F. A social media platform shall limit a minor user’s access to


its services to one (1) hour per day. A social media platform shall


offer the parent or legal guardian of a minor user supervisory tools


that the parent or legal guardian may decide to activate to


supervise the minor user’s usage of the services provided by the


social media platform. Such supervisory tools shall include


capabilities for a parent or legal guardian to:


1. Set time limits for the minor user’s daily social media


service usage across devices;


2. Schedule mandatory breaks for the minor user during selected


days and times across devices;


3. View:


a. data detailing the minor user’s total and average


daily time spent on the social media platform across


devices,

Req. No. 2745 Page 8


b. a list of connected accounts,


c. a list of accounts blocked by the minor user, and


d. the minor user’s:


(1) privacy settings,


(2) content sensitivity settings, and


(3) direct messaging settings and permissions; and


4. Receive notifications when the minor user changes an account


setting described in this subsection.


A social media platform shall inform the parent or legal


guardian of a minor user of their access to these supervisory


features and of the parent or legal guardian’s right to utilize such


features.


G. 1. A social media platform shall not allow a minor user who


is a resident of this state to change the default data privacy


setting provided for in subparagraph a of paragraph 2 of subsection


E of this section without first obtaining verifiable written consent


from a minor user’s parent or legal guardian. The social media


platform shall verify the identity of the person consenting and the


relationship of the person consenting for the minor.


2. A social media platform’s terms of service related to a


minor user who is a resident of this state shall be presumed to


include an assurance of confidentiality for the minor user’s


personal information. The presumption of confidentiality may be


overcome if the social media platform obtains verifiable written

Req. No. 2745 Page 9


consent from a parent or legal guardian of the minor user. The


presumption of confidentiality does not apply to a social media


platform’s internal use or external sharing of a minor user’s


personal information if the use or sharing is necessary to:


a. maintain or analyze functioning of the social media


service,


b. enable network communications,


c. personalize the user’s experience based on the user’s


age and location,


d. display a username chosen by the minor user,


e. obtain reasonable age verification information as


required by subsection C of this section, or


f. comply with the requirements of this act or any other


federal or state law.


H. A social media platform shall:


1. Implement a review process allowing a user to appeal his or


her age designation by submitting documentary evidence to establish


the user’s age range; and


2. Review evidence submitted by the user and make a


determination within thirty (30) days of submission of the evidence.


I. The provisions of this section shall not apply to a text


messaging platform or a platform for which the primary purpose is


related to education or health care.



Req. No. 2745 Page 10


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 403 of Title 75A, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. In the case of a violation of Section 2 of this act, the


Attorney General may bring a civil action in the District Court of


Oklahoma County or a district court in the county in which the


violation occurred to:


1. Enjoin the violation;


2. Enforce compliance with Section 2 of this act; or


3. Obtain civil penalties under subsection C of this section.


B. The Attorney General may promulgate any rules necessary to


enforce the provisions of this act.


C. Any social media company that violates this act shall be


subject to a civil penalty not to exceed Two Thousand Five Hundred


Dollars ($2,500.00) for each violation. Each individual violation


shall be considered a separate violation.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2745 BRC 1/15/2026 8:05:01 AM





Req. No. 2745 Page 11